Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.46.010

State law applicable.

The provisions of Title 46 RCW relating to regulation of motor vehicles shall be applicable to code cities and its officers and employees to the same extent as such provisions grant powers and impose duties upon cities of any class and their officers and agents, including without limitation the following: (1) Authority to provide for angle parking on certain city streets designated as forming a route of a primary state highway as authorized in RCW 46.61.575; (2) application of city police regulations to port districts as authorized by RCW 53.08.230; (3) authority to establish local regulations relating to city streets forming a part of the state highway system as authorized by RCW 46.44.080; (4) exemption from the payment of vehicle license fees for city owned vehicles as authorized by RCW 46.16A.170 and 46.16A.200(8); (5) authority to establish traffic schools as provided by chapter 46.83 RCW; and (6) authority to enforce the provisions of RCW 81.48.050 relating to railroad crossings.

[ 2010 c 161 s 1104; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.46.010.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.